Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1204.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 513 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law, is amended to read:Section 513. Improvement, Reconstruction and Maintenance.--(a) The department shall, at the expense of the Commonwealth improve or reconstruct and maintain all State highways within boroughs and incorporated towns, to such width and of such type as shall be determined by the secretary.(b) The department shall, at the expense of the Commonwealth, construct and maintain all surface and subsurface drainage facilities connected with State highways.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718192021